New York, session 2025-2026, S1543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 13 of section 130.00 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 636 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 13. "Mental health care provider" shall mean a licensed physician, 5 licensed psychologist, registered professional nurse, licensed clinical 6 social worker, licensed master social worker under the supervision of a 7 physician, psychologist or licensed clinical social worker, licensed 8 mental health counselor [or a], licensed marriage and family therapist, 9 licensed psychoanalyst, licensed creative arts therapist, or a licensed 10 behavior analyst. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02551-05-5